Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 28-101, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 28-101. A. In cities having a population of more than


sixty-five thousand (65,000) inhabitants, as determined by the


latest federal census, there is hereby created a “Municipal Criminal


Court of Record of the City of ___________”, subject to the


restrictions of subsection B of this section. References in


Sections 28-101 through 28-128 of this title to the municipal


criminal court of record shall mean the courts established by the


provisions of this article in cities over sixty-five thousand


(65,000) population.



Req. No. 3208 Page 1


B. Before a municipal criminal court of record not in existence


before November 1, 2004, may be created, the municipal governing


body shall determine by resolution that the efficient disposition of


cases involving the violation of municipal ordinances necessitates


creating a court of record. If such a resolution is not adopted,


the criminal court of the municipality shall remain a court not of


record. The governing body shall cause a certified copy of the


resolution to be filed in the office of the county clerk of each


county in which the municipality is located. The resolution and the


filing thereof shall be judicially noticed in all courts of this


state. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any


municipal criminal court of record created prior to November 1,


2004, and such courts shall have all the powers and duties


heretofore provided for such courts.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 28-102, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 28-102. A. The municipal criminal courts of record


shall have original jurisdiction to hear and determine all


prosecutions when a violation of any of the ordinances of the city


where the court is established is charged, as provided by Article


VII, Section 1 of the Oklahoma Constitution.


B. In cases when the penalty provided for the violation of an


ordinance is a fine in the amount of more than Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00), excluding court costs, or by imprisonment, or by both

Req. No. 3208 Page 2


such fine and imprisonment, all persons charged before such


municipal criminal court of record shall be entitled to a trial by


jury, unless waived by the defendant. Judgment and sentence imposed


by the judge shall be as effective as if the same had been rendered


and imposed by a jury.


C. The maximum punishment that may be levied in any municipal


criminal court of record is a fine not exceeding One Thousand Two


Hundred Dollars ($1,200.00) One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($1,500.00) and costs, an imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months


one (1) year, or both such fine and imprisonment. Provided, the


maximum punishment that may be levied in any municipal criminal


court of record for violations of municipal traffic ordinances not


including ordinances relating to driving a motor vehicle under the


influence of alcohol or drugs is a fine not exceeding One Thousand


Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($1,250.00) and costs, an imprisonment not


to exceed ninety (90) days, or both such fine and imprisonment. If


a fine exceeding Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00) is imposed


for an alcohol-related or drug-related traffic offense, the amount


in excess of Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00) shall be used to


defray costs for enforcement of laws relating to juvenile access to


alcohol, other laws relating to alcohol and other intoxicating


substances, and traffic-related offenses involving alcohol or other


intoxicating substances. Provided, further that any municipal


criminal court of record may levy a fine not to exceed One Thousand

Req. No. 3208 Page 3


Dollars ($1,000.00) and costs, an imprisonment not to exceed six (6)


months, or both such fine and imprisonment for violations of


municipal ordinances regulating the pretreatment of wastewater and


regulating stormwater discharges. Provided, further, that for


violations of municipal ordinances relating to prostitution,


including but not limited to engaging in prostitution or soliciting


or procuring prostitution, any municipal criminal court of record in


cities with more than two hundred thousand (200,000) in population


may levy an imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months, and fines as


follows: a fine not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00) upon the first conviction for violation of any such


ordinances, a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars


($5,000.00) upon the second conviction for violation of any of such


ordinances, and a fine of not more than Seven Thousand Five Hundred


Dollars ($7,500.00) upon the third or subsequent convictions for


violation of any of such ordinances, or both such fine and


imprisonment, as well as a term of community service of not less


than forty (40) nor more than eighty (80) hours. If imprisonment is


available for the offense, then that person charged shall have a


right to a jury trial.


D. A defendant who has been in jeopardy for the same or any


lesser included offense in the municipal criminal court of record or


district court shall not be prosecuted in any other court for the


same or a lesser included offense.

Req. No. 3208 Page 4


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3208 YG 1/15/2026 12:25:04 PM











































Req. No. 3208 Page 5